Ohio, session 136, HB529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5725.98, 5726.98, 5729.98, 8
5747.98, and 5751.98 be amended and sections 5725.39, 5726.63, 9
5727.242, 5727.301, 5729.22, 5736.51, 5747.88, and 5751.55 of 10
the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 11
Sec. 5725.39. (A) As used in this section, "tax credit 12
certificate" has the same meaning as in section 5751.55 of the 13
Revised Code. 14
(B) A domestic insurance company issued a tax credit 15
certificate authorizing the company to claim a credit against 16
the tax levied under section 5725.18 of the Revised Code may 17
claim a credit against that tax equal to the amount stated in 18
the certificate. The credit shall be claimed for the calendar 19

H. B. No. 529 Page 2
As Introduced
year preceding the year the certificate was issued and in the 20
order required by section 5725.98 of the Revised Code. Any 21
credit amount in excess of the company's tax liability, after 22
allowing for any other credits preceding the credit in that 23
order, shall be refunded to the company. 24
Sec. 5725.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 25
calculating the amount of tax imposed by section 5725.18 of the 26
Revised Code that is due under this chapter, a taxpayer shall 27
claim any credits and offsets against tax liability to which it 28
is entitled in the following order: 29
The credit for an insurance company or insurance company 30
group under section 5729.031 of the Revised Code; 31
The credit for eligible employee training costs under 32
section 5725.31 of the Revised Code; 33
The credit for purchasers of qualified low-income 34
community investments under section 5725.33 of the Revised Code; 35
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 36
of section 122.171 of the Revised Code; 37
The nonrefundable credit for investments in rural business 38
growth funds under section 122.152 of the Revised Code; 39
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 40
section 5725.36 of the Revised Code; 41
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 42
under section 5725.37 of the Revised Code; 43
The nonrefundable credit for contributing capital to a 44
transformational mixed use development project under section 45
5725.35 of the Revised Code; 46

H. B. No. 529 Page 3
As Introduced
The nonrefundable opportunity zone investment credit under 47
section 5725.38 of the Revised Code; 48
The offset of assessments by the Ohio life and health 49
insurance guaranty association permitted by section 3956.20 of 50
the Revised Code; 51
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 52
building under section 5725.34 of the Revised Code; 53
The refundable credit for Ohio job retention under former 54
division (B)(2) or (3) of section 122.171 of the Revised Code as 55
those divisions existed before September 29, 2015, the effective 56
date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 64 of the 131st 57
general assembly; 58
The refundable credit for Ohio job creation under section 59
5725.32 of the Revised Code; 60
The refundable credit under section 5725.19 of the Revised 61
Code for losses on loans made under the Ohio venture capital 62
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 63
The refundable credit for hiring certain veterans, service 64
members, and their spouses under section 5725.39 of the Revised 65
Code. 66
(B) For any credit except the refundable credits 67
enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a 68
taxable year shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any 69
other credit that precedes it in the order required under this 70
section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried 71
forward if authorized under the section creating that credit. 72
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a taxpayer 73
to claim, directly or indirectly, a credit more than once for a 74
taxable year. 75

H. B. No. 529 Page 4
As Introduced
Sec. 5726.63. (A) As used in this section, "tax credit 76
certificate" has the same meaning as in section 5751.55 of the 77
Revised Code. 78
(B) A taxpayer issued a tax credit certificate authorizing 79
the taxpayer to claim a credit against the tax levied under 80
section 5726.02 of the Revised Code may claim a credit against 81
that tax equal to the amount stated in the certificate. The 82
credit shall be claimed for the taxable year preceding the year 83
in which the certificate is issued and in the order required by 84
section 5726.98 of the Revised Code. Any credit amount in excess 85
of the taxpayer's tax liability, after allowing for any other 86
credits preceding the credit in that order, shall be refunded to 87
the taxpayer. 88
Sec. 5726.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 89
calculating the amount of tax due under section 5726.02 of the 90
Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits to which the 91
taxpayer is entitled under this chapter in the following order: 92
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 93
of section 5726.50 of the Revised Code; 94
The nonrefundable credit for purchases of qualified low- 95
income community investments under section 5726.54 of the 96
Revised Code; 97
The nonrefundable credit for transformational mixed use 98
development tax credit certificate holders under section 5726.62 99
of the Revised Code; 100
The nonrefundable credit for qualified research expenses 101
under section 5726.56 of the Revised Code; 102
The nonrefundable credit for qualifying dealer in 103
intangibles taxes under section 5726.57 of the Revised Code; 104

H. B. No. 529 Page 5
As Introduced
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 105
section 5726.58 of the Revised Code; 106
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 107
under section 5726.60 of the Revised Code; 108
The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit 109
under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; 110
The nonrefundable opportunity zone investment credit under 111
section 5726.61 of the Revised Code; 112
The refundable credit for rehabilitating an historic 113
building under section 5726.52 of the Revised Code; 114
The refundable job retention or job creation credit under 115
division (A) of section 5726.50 of the Revised Code; 116
The refundable credit under section 5726.53 of the Revised 117
Code for losses on loans made under the Ohio venture capital 118
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 119
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 120
production credit under section 5726.55 of the Revised Code; 121
The refundable credit for hiring certain veterans, service 122
members, and their spouses under section 5726.63 of the Revised 123
Code. 124
(B) For any credit except the refundable credits 125
enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a 126
taxable year shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any 127
other credit that precedes it in the order required under this 128
section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried 129
forward if authorized under the section creating that credit. 130
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a taxpayer 131
to claim, directly or indirectly, a credit more than once for a 132

H. B. No. 529 Page 6
As Introduced
taxable year. 133
Sec. 5727.242. (A) As used in this section : 134
(1) "Tax credit certificate" has the same meaning as in 135
section 5751.55 of the Revised Code. 136
(2) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the tax levied 137
under section 5727.24 of the Revised Code. 138
(B) A taxpayer issued a tax credit certificate authorizing 139
the taxpayer to claim a credit against the tax levied under 140
section 5727.24 of the Revised Code may claim a credit against 141
that tax equal to the amount stated in the certificate. The 142
credit shall be claimed on the first return due under section 143
5727.25 of the Revised Code after the certificate is issued and 144
after the credits authorized in sections 5727.241 and 5727.29 of 145
the Revised Code. Any credit amount in excess of the taxpayer's 146
tax liability, after allowing for any other credits preceding 147
the credit in that order, shall be refunded to the taxpayer. 148
Sec. 5727.301. (A) As used in this section : 149
(1) "Tax credit certificate" has the same meaning as in 150
section 5751.55 of the Revised Code. 151
(2) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the tax levied 152
under section 5727.30 of the Revised Code. 153
(B) A taxpayer issued a tax credit certificate authorizing 154
the taxpayer to claim a credit against the tax levied under 155
section 5727.30 of the Revised Code may claim a credit against 156
that tax equal to the amount stated in the certificate. The 157
credit shall be claimed on the first report due under section 158
5727.31 of the Revised Code after the certificate is issued and 159
after the credit authorized in section 5727.29 of the Revised 160

H. B. No. 529 Page 7
As Introduced
Code. Any credit amount in excess of the taxpayer's tax 161
liability, after allowing for the preceding credit, shall be 162
refunded to the taxpayer. 163
Sec. 5729.22. (A) As used in this section, "tax credit 164
certificate" has the same meaning as in section 5751.55 of the 165
Revised Code. 166
(B) A foreign insurance company issued a tax credit 167
certificate authorizing the company to claim a credit against 168
the tax levied under section 5729.03 of the Revised Code may 169
claim a credit against that tax equal to the amount stated in 170
the certificate. The credit shall be claimed for the calendar 171
year preceding the year in which the certificate is issued and 172
in the order required by section 5729.98 of the Revised Code. 173
Any credit amount in excess of the company's tax liability, 174
after allowing for any other credits preceding the credit in 175
that order, shall be refunded to the company. 176
(C) A foreign insurance company shall not be required to 177
pay any additional tax levied under section 5729.06 of the 178
Revised Code as a result of claiming the tax credit authorized 179
under this section. 180
Sec. 5729.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 181
calculating the amount of tax due under this chapter, a taxpayer 182
shall claim any credits and offsets against tax liability to 183
which it is entitled in the following order: 184
The credit for an insurance company or insurance company 185
group under section 5729.031 of the Revised Code; 186
The credit for eligible employee training costs under 187
section 5729.07 of the Revised Code; 188
The credit for purchases of qualified low-income community 189

H. B. No. 529 Page 8
As Introduced
investments under section 5729.16 of the Revised Code; 190
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 191
of section 122.171 of the Revised Code; 192
The nonrefundable credit for investments in rural business 193
growth funds under section 122.152 of the Revised Code; 194
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 195
section 5729.19 of the Revised Code; 196
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 197
under section 5729.20 of the Revised Code; 198
The nonrefundable credit for contributing capital to a 199
transformational mixed use development project under section 200
5729.18 of the Revised Code; 201
The nonrefundable opportunity zone investment credit under 202
section 5729.21 of the Revised Code; 203
The offset of assessments by the Ohio life and health 204
insurance guaranty association against tax liability permitted 205
by section 3956.20 of the Revised Code; 206
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 207
building under section 5729.17 of the Revised Code; 208
The refundable credit for Ohio job retention under former 209
division (B)(2) or (3) of section 122.171 of the Revised Code as 210
those divisions existed before September 29, 2015, the effective 211
date of the amendment of this section by H.B. 64 of the 131st 212
general assembly; 213
The refundable credit for Ohio job creation under section 214
5729.032 of the Revised Code; 215
The refundable credit under section 5729.08 of the Revised 216

H. B. No. 529 Page 9
As Introduced
Code for losses on loans made under the Ohio venture capital 217
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 218
The refundable credit for hiring certain veterans, service 219
members, and their spouses under section 5729.22 of the Revised 220
Code. 221
(B) For any credit except the refundable credits 222
enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a 223
taxable year shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any 224
other credit that precedes it in the order required under this 225
section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried 226
forward if authorized under the section creating that credit. 227
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to allow a taxpayer 228
to claim, directly or indirectly, a credit more than once for a 229
taxable year. 230
Sec. 5736.51. (A) As used in this section, "tax credit 231
certificate" has the same meaning as in section 5751.55 of the 232
Revised Code. 233
(B) A taxpayer issued a tax credit certificate authorizing 234
the taxpayer to claim a credit against the tax levied under 235
section 5736.02 of the Revised Code may claim a credit against 236
that tax equal to the amount stated in the certificate. The 237
credit shall be claimed for the tax period preceding the tax 238
period in which the certificate is issued and after any credit 239
authorized in section 5736.50 of the Revised Code. Any credit 240
amount in excess of the taxpayer's tax liability shall be 241
refunded to the taxpayer. 242
Sec. 5747.88. (A) As used in this section, "tax credit 243
certificate" has the same meaning as in section 5751.55 of the 244
Revised Code. 245

H. B. No. 529 Page 10
As Introduced
(B) There is allowed a refundable credit against a 246
taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 5747.02 of the 247
Revised Code equal to the amount stated in a tax credit 248
certificate, to the extent the certificate authorizes the credit 249
to be claimed against that tax liability. The credit shall be 250
claimed for the taxable year preceding the taxable year in which 251
the certificate is issued and in the order required by section 252
5747.98 of the Revised Code. Any credit amount in excess of the 253
taxpayer's tax liability, after allowing for any other credits 254
preceding the credit in that order, shall be refunded to the 255
taxpayer. 256
Nothing in this section limits or disallows pass-through 257
treatment of the credit if the person to which the certificate 258
is issued is a pass-through entity. 259
Sec. 5747.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 260
calculating a taxpayer's aggregate tax liability under section 261
5747.02 of the Revised Code, a taxpayer shall claim any credits 262
to which the taxpayer is entitled in the following order: 263
Either the retirement income credit under division (B) of 264
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum retirement 265
income credits under divisions (C), (D), and (E) of that 266
section; 267
Either the senior citizen credit under division (F) of 268
section 5747.055 of the Revised Code or the lump sum 269
distribution credit under division (G) of that section; 270
The dependent care credit under section 5747.054 of the 271
Revised Code; 272
The credit for displaced workers who pay for job training 273
under section 5747.27 of the Revised Code; 274

H. B. No. 529 Page 11
As Introduced
The twenty-dollar personal exemption credit under section 275
5747.022 of the Revised Code; 276
The joint filing credit under division (E) of section 277
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 278
The earned income credit under section 5747.71 of the 279
Revised Code; 280
The nonrefundable credit for education expenses under 281
section 5747.72 of the Revised Code; 282
The nonrefundable credit for donations to scholarship 283
granting organizations under section 5747.73 of the Revised 284
Code; 285
The nonrefundable credit for tuition paid to a 286
nonchartered nonpublic school under section 5747.75 of the 287
Revised Code; 288
The nonrefundable vocational job credit under section 289
5747.057 of the Revised Code; 290
The nonrefundable job retention credit under division (B) 291
of section 5747.058 of the Revised Code; 292
The enterprise zone credit under section 5709.66 of the 293
Revised Code; 294
The credit for beginning farmers who participate in a 295
financial management program under division (B) of section 296
5747.77 of the Revised Code; 297
The credit for commercial vehicle operator training 298
expenses under section 5747.82 of the Revised Code; 299
The nonrefundable welcome home Ohio (WHO) program credit 300
under section 122.633 of the Revised Code; 301

H. B. No. 529 Page 12
As Introduced
The nonrefundable credit for transformational mixed use 302
development tax credit certificate holders under section 5747.87 303
of the Revised Code; 304
The credit for selling or renting agricultural assets to 305
beginning farmers under division (A) of section 5747.77 of the 306
Revised Code; 307
The credit for purchases of qualifying grape production 308
property under section 5747.28 of the Revised Code; 309
The small business investment credit under section 5747.81 310
of the Revised Code; 311
The nonrefundable lead abatement credit under section 312
5747.26 of the Revised Code; 313
The opportunity zone investment credit under section 314
5747.86 of the Revised Code; 315
The enterprise zone credits under section 5709.65 of the 316
Revised Code; 317
The research and development credit under section 5747.331 318
of the Revised Code; 319
The credit for rehabilitating a historic building under 320
section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 321
The nonrefundable Ohio low-income housing tax credit under 322
section 5747.83 of the Revised Code; 323
The nonrefundable affordable single-family home credit 324
under section 5747.84 of the Revised Code; 325
The nonresident credit under division (A) of section 326
5747.05 of the Revised Code; 327
The credit for a resident's out-of-state income under 328

H. B. No. 529 Page 13
As Introduced
division (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code; 329
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 330
production credit under section 5747.66 of the Revised Code; 331
The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention 332
credit under division (A) of section 5747.058 of the Revised 333
Code; 334
The refundable credit for taxes paid by a qualifying 335
entity granted under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code; 336
The refundable credits for taxes paid by a qualifying 337
pass-through entity granted under division (I) of section 338
5747.08 of the Revised Code; 339
The refundable credit under section 5747.80 of the Revised 340
Code for losses on loans made to the Ohio venture capital 341
program under sections 150.01 to 150.10 of the Revised Code; 342
The refundable credit for rehabilitating a historic 343
building under section 5747.76 of the Revised Code; 344
The refundable credit under section 5747.39 of the Revised 345
Code for taxes levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code 346
paid by an electing pass-through entity; 347
The refundable credit for hiring certain veterans, service 348
members, and their spouses under section 5747.88 of the Revised 349
Code. 350
(B) For any credit, except the refundable credits 351
enumerated in this section and the credit granted under division 352
(H) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code, the amount of the 353
credit for a taxable year shall not exceed the taxpayer's 354
aggregate amount of tax due under section 5747.02 of the Revised 355
Code, after allowing for any other credit that precedes it in 356

H. B. No. 529 Page 14
As Introduced
the order required under this section. Any excess amount of a 357
particular credit may be carried forward if authorized under the 358
section creating that credit. Nothing in this chapter shall be 359
construed to allow a taxpayer to claim, directly or indirectly, 360
a credit more than once for a taxable year. 361
Sec. 5751.55. (A) As used in this section : 362
(1) "Qualifying employee" means a veteran, disabled 363
veteran, or a member of the national guard or the reserve 364
components of the armed forces of the United States, or the 365
spouse of any such person. 366
(2) "Credit period" means the calendar year for which a 367
credit is approved under division (B)(1) of this section, and 368
the following four calendar years, subject to division (B)(2) of 369
this section. 370
(3) "Tax credit certificate" means the certificate issued 371
by the tax commissioner under division (B)(1) or (2) of this 372
section. 373
(B)(1) An employer who employs a qualifying employee may 374
submit an application to the tax commissioner for a tax credit 375
authorized by this section. The application shall be made on a 376
form and in a manner that the commissioner shall prescribe. The 377
application shall state the qualifying employee's hiring date 378
and, if applicable, termination date, the total hours the 379
qualifying employee worked in the preceding calendar year, the 380
tax against which the credit would be claimed, and any other 381
information the commissioner may require. An employer shall 382
submit the application on or before the fifteenth day of 383
January. 384
The commissioner shall evaluate applications in the order 385

H. B. No. 529 Page 15
As Introduced
in which they are received and issue a determination to an 386
applicant no earlier than the fifteenth day of January. If the 387
commissioner denies an application, the determination shall 388
state the reason for the denial. If the commissioner approves an 389
application, the determination shall include a certificate 390
listing the amount of credit that the applicant may claim and 391
the tax against which it may be claimed. 392
(2) A tax credit approved under division (B)(1) of this 393
section may be claimed for the calendar year in which the credit 394
is approved and for the four following calendar years, according 395
to the number of hours the qualifying employee works in each 396
such year and provided the qualifying employee remains employed 397
with the applicant in each year and the employer submits 398
continuing applications as required in division (B)(2) of this 399
section. 400
Not later than the first day of the December in the year 401
in which a tax credit certificate is issued under division (B) 402
(1) of this section, and the next three first days of December, 403
the commissioner shall furnish, by ordinary mail, a continuing 404
application to each person approved for the credit under that 405
division. The continuing application shall be used to report 406
whether the qualifying employee qualifies the employer for the 407
credit because the employee is a disabled veteran or another 408
type of qualifying employee, the total hours the qualifying 409
employee worked in the preceding year, and the tax against which 410
the credit is sought, if different from the initial application. 411
The continuing application shall be submitted to the 412
commissioner not later than the thirty-first day of December. 413
The commissioner shall issue a determination to an 414
applicant after the thirty-first day of December, but before the 415

H. B. No. 529 Page 16
As Introduced
fifteenth day of the following January. If the commissioner 416
denies an application, the determination shall state the reason 417
for the denial. If the commissioner approves an application, the 418
determination shall include a certificate listing the amount of 419
credit that the applicant may claim and the tax against which it 420
may be claimed. 421
(3) The commissioner may not approve more than one million 422
dollars in tax credits for a calendar year under divisions (B) 423
(1) and (2) of this section. The commissioner shall give 424
priority to approving continuing applications under division (B) 425
(2) over initial applications under division (B)(1) of this 426
section when applying that limit. 427
(C) The amount of a credit authorized by this section 428
shall be calculated as follows, subject to reduction under 429
division (C)(3) of this section: 430
(1) For each qualifying employee who is a disabled veteran 431
and who is employed by the applicant for at least one hundred 432
eighty days in the preceding year, the amount of the credit for 433
each year of the credit period shall equal seven hundred fifty 434
dollars, if employed by the applicant for any period in the 435
preceding year on a full-time basis, or three hundred seventy- 436
five dollars, if otherwise employed by the applicant. The credit 437
amount for a qualifying employee that is not a disabled veteran 438
for the initial credit year, but in a later year in the credit 439
period qualifies as a disabled veteran, shall be calculated 440
under division (C)(1) instead of division (C)(2) of this section 441
for each of those later years remaining in the credit period. 442
(2) For any other qualifying employee who is employed by 443
the applicant for at least one hundred eighty days in the 444
preceding year, one of the following: 445

H. B. No. 529 Page 17
As Introduced
(a) For the initial year of the credit period, five 446
hundred dollars if the employee is employed by the applicant for 447
any period in the preceding year on a full-time basis or two 448
hundred fifty dollars if the employee is otherwise employed by 449
the applicant; 450
(b) For any other year of the credit period, two hundred 451
dollars if the employee is employed by the applicant for any 452
period in the preceding year on a full-time basis or one hundred 453
dollars if the employee is otherwise employed by the applicant. 454
(3) If a qualifying employee is employed by the applicant 455
for fewer than one hundred eighty days of the preceding year, 456
then the amount of the credit calculated under division (C)(1) 457
or (2) of this section shall equal the product of the otherwise 458
applicable dollar amount under that division and the percentage 459
of the days of the year in which the employee was employed by 460
the applicant. 461
(D) For each year of a credit period, an employer may 462
claim a refundable credit against the tax imposed under section 463
5725.18, 5726.02, 5727.24, 5727.30, 5729.03, 5736.02, 5747.02, 464
or 5751.02 of the Revised Code, as authorized by the tax credit 465
certificate, equal to the amount listed on that certificate. The 466
credit shall be claimed in the manner prescribed by division (E) 467
of this section or by section 5725.39, 5726.63, 5727.242, 468
5727.301, 5729.22, 5736.51, or 5747.88 of the Revised Code, as 469
applicable. 470
(E) A taxpayer issued a tax credit certificate authorizing 471
the taxpayer to claim a credit against the tax levied under 472
section 5751.02 of the Revised Code may claim a credit against 473
that tax equal to the amount stated in the certificate. The 474
credit shall be claimed for the tax period preceding the tax 475

H. B. No. 529 Page 18
As Introduced
period in which the certificate is issued and in the order 476
required by section 5751.98 of the Revised Code. Any credit 477
amount in excess of the taxpayer's tax liability, after allowing 478
for any other credits preceding the credit in that order, shall 479
be refunded to the taxpayer. 480
(F)(1) The tax commissioner shall adopt any rules 481
necessary to implement this section. Such rules shall include 482
all of the following: 483
(a) Criteria to evaluate whether an employee is a 484
qualifying employee; 485
(b) Criteria to evaluate whether a qualifying employee was 486
employed full-time or less than full-time in the preceding year; 487
(c) Supplementary definitions as may be necessary to 488
administer this section. 489
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of section 121.95 of the 490
Revised Code to the contrary, a regulatory restriction contained 491
in a rule adopted under this section is not subject to sections 492
121.95 to 121.953 of the Revised Code. 493
Sec. 5751.98. (A) To provide a uniform procedure for 494
calculating the amount of tax due under this chapter, a taxpayer 495
shall claim any credits to which it is entitled in the following 496
order: 497
The nonrefundable jobs retention credit under division (B) 498
of section 5751.50 of the Revised Code; 499
The nonrefundable credit for qualified research expenses 500
under division (B) of section 5751.51 of the Revised Code; 501
The nonrefundable credit for a borrower's qualified 502
research and development loan payments under division (B) of 503

H. B. No. 529 Page 19
As Introduced
section 5751.52 of the Revised Code; 504
The nonrefundable credit for unused net operating losses 505
under section 5751.53 of the Revised Code; 506
The refundable motion picture and broadway theatrical 507
production credit under section 5751.54 of the Revised Code; 508
The refundable jobs creation credit or job retention 509
credit under division (A) of section 5751.50 of the Revised 510
Code; 511
The refundable credit for hiring certain veterans, service 512
members, and their spouses under section 5751.55 of the Revised 513
Code. 514
(B) For any credit except the refundable credits 515
enumerated in this section, the amount of the credit for a tax 516
period shall not exceed the tax due after allowing for any other 517
credit that precedes it in the order required under this 518
section. Any excess amount of a particular credit may be carried 519
forward if authorized under the section creating the credit. 520
Section 2. That existing sections 5725.98, 5726.98, 521
5729.98, 5747.98, and 5751.98 of the Revised Code are hereby 522
repealed. 523
Section 3. The enactment by this act of sections 5725.39, 524
5726.63, 5727.242, 5727.301, 5729.22, 5736.51, 5747.88, and 525
5751.55 of the Revised Code applies to qualifying employees 526
hired as described in section 5751.55 of the Revised Code on or 527
after the first day of the first January following the effective 528
date of this section. 529